Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5444.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-14-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-14 entitled "Speed
Restrictions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-14-3. Conditions requiring reduced speed.
(a) The driver of every vehicle shall, consistent with the requirements of § 31-14-1, drive
at an appropriate reduced speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railroad grade
crossing; when approaching and going around a curve; when approaching a hill crest; when
traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway; when a special hazard exists with respect to
pedestrians or other traffic or by reason of weather or highway conditions; and in the presence of
emergency vehicles displaying flashing lights as provided in § 31-24-31, tow trucks, transporter
trucks, highway maintenance equipment displaying flashing lights (while performing maintenance
operations), roadside assistance vehicles displaying flashing amber lights while assisting a disabled
motor vehicle, and any nonemergency vehicle that is stationary and located on the shoulder or
breakdown lane of a roadway or highway. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated
in § 31-41.1-4.
(b) When an authorized vehicle, as described in subsection (a), is parked or standing within
twelve feet (12′) of a roadway and, if required pursuant to subsection (a), is giving a warning signal
by appropriate light, the driver of every other approaching vehicle shall, as soon as it is safe, and
when not otherwise directed by an individual lawfully directing traffic, do one of the following:
(1) Move the vehicle into a lane that is not the lane nearest the parked or standing

authorized highway maintenance equipment displaying flashing lights (while performing
maintenance operations), tow truck, transporter trucks, roadside assistance vehicles, emergency
vehicle, or nonemergency vehicle and continue traveling in that lane until safely clear of the
authorized highway maintenance equipment displaying flashing lights (while performing
maintenance operations), tow truck, transporter trucks, roadside assistance vehicles, emergency
vehicle, or nonemergency vehicle. This paragraph applies only if the roadway has at least two (2)
lanes for traffic proceeding in the direction of the approaching vehicle and if the approaching
vehicle may change lanes safely and without interfering with any vehicular traffic; or
(2) Slow the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for traffic conditions, and operate the vehicle
at a reduced speed until completely past the authorized highway maintenance equipment displaying
flashing lights (while performing maintenance operations), tow truck, transporter trucks, roadside
assistance vehicle, emergency vehicle, or nonemergency vehicle. This paragraph applies only if the
roadway has only one lane for traffic proceeding in the direction of the approaching vehicle or if
the approaching vehicle may not change lanes safely and without interfering with any vehicular
traffic. For purposes of this section, slowing the vehicle shall mean to a rate of twenty miles per
hour (20 mph) under the posted speed limit.
Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001087
========
LC001087 - Page 2 of 3